Massachusetts, session 194th, H131.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Not withstanding any state law to the contrary, the State of Massachusetts Department of 
Marine Fisheries shall allow any person with a commercial Commonwealth lobster permit issued 
to fish according to his/her permit for 12 months a year in state waters as defined by the United 
Nations Convention on the Law of the Seas (UNCLOS).